Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2113
Reserves; amount.

Each year the corporation shall set apart, as a reserve against losses and contingencies, not less than ten percent of its net earnings for the preceding fiscal year until such reserve shall be equal in value to one-half of the amount paid in on the capital stock then outstanding. Whenever the amount of such reserve so evidenced shall become impaired, it shall be built up again to the required amount in the manner provided for its original accumulation.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 13, p. 307.